DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DI-15

DIAGNOSTIC TROUBLE CODE CHART

NOTICE:

When removing the part, turn the ignition switch OFF.

HINT:

e UsingSST 09843 -18020, connecttheterminals TcandE

ofcheck connector.

. Ifany abnormality is notfound wheninspecting parts, inspectthe ECU.
. Ifamalfunction codeis displayed duringthe DTC check, check the circuit listed that code. For details
of each code, turn to the page referred to under the "See page” for respective "DTC No.” in the DTC

DI6X1-01

chart.
DTC chart of ABS:
DTC No. )
Detection ltem Trouble Area
(See Page)
C0278/ 11 N . .
Open or short circuit in ABS solenoid relay circuit
(D1-35) « ABS selenaidrelac)
C0279/ 12 * ABS solenoid relay circuit
B+ short circuit in ABS solenoid relay circuit
(DI-35)
C0226/21 Open or shortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit ¢ Hydraulic brake booster
(DI-32) (SFRcircuit) * SFRR or SFRH circuit
C0236/22 Open or shortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit ¢ Hydraulic brake booster
(DI-32) (SFLcircuit) e SFLRor SFLH circuit
C0246/23 Openor shortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit * Hydraulic brake booster
(DI-32) (SRRcircuit) * SRRR or SRRH circuit
C0256/24 Openor shortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit * Hydraulic brake booster
(DI-32) (SRLcircuit) ¢ SRLRor SRLH circuit
C1225/25 Open or shortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit ¢ Hydraulic brake booster
(DI-54) (SAT circuit) * SA1 circuit
C1226/26 Open or shortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit ¢ Hydraulic brake booster
(DI-54) (SA2circuit) e SA2circuit
C1227/27 Openor shortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster * Hydraulic brake booster
(DI-54) solenoid circuit (SA3 circuit) * SA3circuit
C1228/28 Open or shortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit * Hydraulic brake booster
(DI-54) (STRcircuit) * STRcircuit
1
C0200/31* ) . .
Right front wheel speed sensor signal malfunction
(DI-25)
1
C0205/32* . .
(DI-25) Left front wheel speed sensor signal malfunction « Right front, leftfront, right rear and left rear speed sensor
T « Each'speed'sensorcircuit -
C0210/33* ) . . s
(DI-25) Right rear wheel speed sensor signal malfunction * Sensorrotor
1
C0215/34* . .
Left rear wheel speed sensor signal malfunction
(DI-25)
C1237/37 L . ) N
Some tire is different size from the other tires Tire size
(DI-66)
* Batt
C1241/ 41 , attery
(DI-67) Low battery voltage or abnormally high battery voltage «|Cregulator
* Power source circuit
2 * Batt
C1242/42* o o attery
(DI-71) Open circuit in 1G2 circuit *|Cregulator
* Power source circuit
C1243/ 43 L . * Deceleration sensor
Malfunction in deceleration sensor (constant output) ) )
(DI-75) *Wire harness for deceleration sensor system
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DI-16

DIAGNOSTICS

ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

C1244 / 44 o . o ¢ Deceleration sensor
Open or short circuit in deceleration sensor circuit ) -
(DI-77) * Deceleration sensor circuit
C1245/ 45 L . * Deceleration sensor
Malfunction in deceleration sensor . .
(DI-75) * Wire harness for deceleration sensor system
C1246/ 46 L . » Master cylinder pressure sensor
Malfunction in master cylinder pressure sensor . -
(DI-79) * Master cylinder pressure sensor circuit
C1249/ 49 L ) ) o ) ) o
(DI-82) Open circuit in stop light switch circuit Stop light switch circuit

Z
C1251/51*
(D1-87)

Pump motorislocked
Open circuitin pump motor ground

Hydraulic brake booster pump motor

2
C1252/52*
(DI-90)

Hydraulic brake booster pump motor malfunction

» Hydraulic brake booster pump motor
* Hydraulic brake booster pump motor circuit
* Pressure switch (PHor PL)

2
C1253/53*
(DI-96)

Hydraulic brake booster pump motor relay malfunction

* ABS motor 1 or ABS motor 2relay
* ABS motor 1 or ABS motor 2relay circuit
» Hydraulic brake booster pump motor circuit

P4
C1254/54*
(DI-101)

Pressure switch malfunction

* Pressure switch (PHor PL)
¢ Pressure switch circuit

2
C1256/56*
(DI-104)

Accumulator low pressure malfunction

e Accumulator
* Pressure switch (PHor PL)
» Hydraulic brake booster pump motor

2 *Batt
C1257/57* . N . 2 e P
(DI-110) Power supply drive circuit malfunction * Power source circuit
*ABS&BA&TRC&VSCECU
C1268/68 . . L . * Transfer L4 position switch
Transfer L4 position signal transmission failure . . o
(DI-114) « Transfer L4 position switch circuit
C1269/69 Malfunction i tral start switch circuit (R * Neutral start switch
nction in neutr r ran
(DI-117) alfunction in neutral start switch circuit (R range) « Neutral start switch circuit (Rrange)
* Battery
Always ON «|Cregulator
way Malfunction in ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU ot o
(DI-126) e Power source circuit

*ABS&BA&TRC&VSCECU

*': Asthe DTC cannotbe erased by replacing parts alone do either of the following operations.

(1) Clear DTC (See page DI-4).
(2) Atthe vehicle speed of 20 km/h (12 mph), drive the vehicle for 30 sec. or more.

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM731E)



DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) & DI-17
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

2
* :Usingthefollowing table, troubled parts can be specified.

DTC 42 51 52 53 54 56 57
BRAKE Warning ||ght andbuzzer Light Buzzer LightBuzzer| LightBuzzer LightBuzzer LightBuzzer LightBuzzer LighBuzzer|
O O O 0 O
Pressure switch PH
PL O U O U U
Pump motor bpu gt 0|y
Pump motor circuit MTT wire harness
MT+ wire harness 0
MT- wire harness 0
Accumulator malfunction O|D
MR1 open circuit U
o MR2 open circuit -
Motor relay circuit 01l o 0
MR1 welded contact
MR2 welded contact Y -
Hydraulicbrake booster| Pressureleaks o (o oo
Power source* IG2 open circuit O
ECU Power supply circuit 0

*: When IG1 circuit is open, ABS warning light and BRAKE warning light come on.
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DI-18 DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DTC chart of VSC:
DTC No. )
Detection ltem Trouble Area
(See Page)
C1231 /31 L . « Steering angle sensor
Malfunction in steering angle sensor . —
(DI-56) « Steering angle sensor circuit
C1232/32 L . * Deceleration sensor
Malfunction in deceleration sensor . N
(DI-60) * Deceleration sensor circuit
C1233/33 Open or short circuit in yaw rate sensor circuit " Yawrate sensor
ircuit in yaw ircui
(DI-62) P ! 4 !  Yawrate sensor circuit
C1234 /34 L *Yawrate sensor
Malfunction in yaw rate sensor .
(DI-62)  Yaw rate sensor circuit
C1210/ 36 . o * Yawrate sensor o
Zero point calibration of yaw rate sensor undone *Yaw rate sensor circuit
(DI-120) . o
« Neutral start switch circuit (P range)
C1207 /37 Malfunction | ral start switch (P/R * Neutral start switch
nction in neutr ran
(DI-44) alfunction in neutral start switch ( ange) « Neutral start switch circuit (P/R range)
* Decelerationsensor
C1336/39 o , ) o
Zero point calibration of deceleration sensor * Deceleration sensor circuit
(DI-120) ) o
« Neutral start switch (P range) circuit
C1223 /43 .
(DI-50) Malfunction in ABS control system ABS control system
*NEOcircuit
C1224/ 44 o - ore
(DI-51) Open or short circuit in NE signal circuit *EngineandECTECU
*ABS&BA&TRC&VSCECU
C1340/ 47 o ireult ter diff ial lock sianal « Center differential lock system
n cir n center ren n
(DI-123) pen circult In center cifferential lock signa « Center differential lock circuit
C1201/ 51 ) . .
(DI-41) Engine and ECT ECU system malfunction Engine control system
C1203 /53 . R . *TRC+orTRC —circ.uit .
(DI-42) Engine and ECT ECU communication circuit malfunction *ENG+0rENG - circuit
*EngineandECTECU
Always ON Malfunctionin ABS & BA& TRC & VSCECU » Power source circuit
(DI-130) Open circuitin VSC TRC warning light circuit «VSC TRCwarninglightcircuit
HINT:

Thereisacasethathand -heldtestercannotbe used whenVSC TRC warninglightis alwayson.
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